Wyoming, session 2026, SF0102.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) The Wyoming energy authority shall complete a
transmission planning study in accordance with all of the
following:
(i) The study shall be completed in two (2)
phases, in accordance with this subsection;
(ii) Phase one (1) of the study shall, at a
minimum, be an analysis of the impacts of three (3)
potential load growth scenarios on Wyoming's current
transmission system and shall include all of the following:
(A) A model of Wyoming's transmission needs
with an assessment of the three (3) potential load growth
scenarios identified in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph
to identify potential deliverability and congestion
constraints;
(B) Consideration of advanced transmission
technologies and electricity storage to meet the need for
expanded transmission capacity in Wyoming from 2026 to 2046
under each of the three (3) potential load growth scenarios
identified in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0102
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(C) The consideration of three (3) load
growth scenarios in completing this phase of the study,
which are:
(I) Low growth;
(II) Moderate growth;
(III) High demand.
(D) A gap analysis identifying transmission
needs to meet various load growth scenarios, including
those identified in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph.
(iii) Phase two (2) of the study shall, at a
minimum, develop a qualitative summary and narrative of
Wyoming's public utilities' participation, if any, in
regional transmission organizations, independent system
operators and real-time and extended day ahead markets.
(b) The Wyoming energy authority shall report to the
joint corporations, election and political subdivisions
interim committee and the joint minerals, business and
economic development interim committee:
(i) Not later than November 1, 2027 on the
results of phase one (1) of the study;
(ii) Not later than September 1, 2028 on the
results of phase two (2) of the study.
(c) The Wyoming energy authority shall establish an
advisory working group to provide input on the methodology,
assumptions and findings of the study required under this
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0102
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
section. The advisory working group shall, at a minimum,
include representatives of:
(i) Rural electric cooperatives serving Wyoming;
(ii) Investor-owned electric utilities serving
Wyoming;
(iii) Municipal electric utilities serving
Wyoming;
(iv) The Wyoming public service commission;
(v) The office of consumer advocate.
(d) The advisory working group established under
subsection (c) of this section shall be consulted
throughout both phases of the study, including during the
development of study methodology and scenario assumptions,
review of preliminary findings and formulation of
recommendations.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0102
ENROLLED ACT NO. 50, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4